Oklahoma, session 2025, HB1689.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 21 O.S. 2021, Section 1702, is
amended to read as follows:
Section 1702. A. One who finds lost property under
circumstances which gives him the person knowledge or means of
inquiry as to the true owner, and who appropriates such property to
his or her own use, or to the use of another person who is not
entitled thereto, without having first made such effort to find the
owner and restore the property to him the owner as the circumstances
render reasonable and just, is guilty of larceny punishable as
follows:
HB1689 HFLR Page 1
BOLD FACE denotes Committee Amendments.

1. If the value of the property is less than One Thousand
Dollars ($ 1,000.00), the person shall be guilty of a misdemeanor
punishable by imprisonment in the county jail not to exceed one (1)
year, or by a fine not to exceed Five Hundred Dollars ($500.00), or
by both such imprisonment and fine;
2. If the value of the property is One Thousand Dollars
($1,000.00) or more but less than Two Thousand Five Hundred Dollars
($2,500.00), the person shall be guilty of a felony punishable by
imprisonment in the custody of the Department of Corrections not to
exceed two (2) years, or in the county jail not to exceed one (1)
year, or by a fine not to exceed One Thousand Dollars ($1,000.00),
or by both such imprisonment and fine;
3. If the value of the property is Two Thousand Five Hundred
Dollars ($2,500.00) or more but less than Fifteen Thousand Dollars
($15,000.00), the person shall be guilty of a felony punishable by
imprisonment in the custody of the Department of Corrections not to
exceed five (5) years, or in the county jail not to exceed one (1)
year, or by a fine not to exceed One Thousand Dollars ($1,000.00),
or by both such imprisonment and fine; and
4. If the value of the property is Fifteen Thousand Dollars
($15,000.00) or more, the person shall be guilty of a felony
punishable by imprisonment in the custody of the Department of
Corrections not to exceed eight (8) years, or by a fine not to

HB1689 HFLR Page 2
BOLD FACE denotes Committee Amendments.

exce ed One Thousand Dollars ($1,000.00), or by both such
imprisonment and fine.
B. It shall be unlawful:
1. To remove a shopping cart from the parking area of a retail
establishment with the intent to permanently or temporarily deprive
the owner of the shopping cart the use of the cart; or
2. To be in possession of any shopping cart that has been
removed from the parking area of a retail establishment with the
intent to permanently or temporarily deprive the owner of the
shopping cart the use of the cart.
Any person who violates the provisions of this subsection shall,
upon conviction, be guilty of a misdemeanor punishable by
imprisonment in a county jail not to exceed one (1) year, or by a
fine not to exceed One Thousand Dollars ($1,000.00), or by both such
fine and imprisonment.
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.

COMMITTEE REPORT BY: COMMITTEE ON JUDICIARY AND PUBLIC SAFETY
OVERSIGHT, dated 03/04/2025 - DO PASS, As Coauthored.






HB1689 HFLR Page 3
BOLD FACE denotes Committee Amendments.